Arkansas, session 2025, HB1593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-27-104(h), concerning the report made by
the Board of Corrections to the Governor and the General Assembly, is amended
to read as follows:
(h)(1) The Board of Corrections shall submit to the Governor and the
General Assembly a biennial report six (6) months prior to the convening of
the regular session an annual report on the work of both the Division of
Correction and the Division of Community Correction after each fiscal year.
(2) The portion of the report regarding the Division of
Correction shall include:
(A) Statistics and other data;
(B) The income derived by the Division of Correction from
*CEB163*
02/25/2025 2:56:54 PM CEB163

HB1593
agricultural activities and from prison inmates' activities;
(C) A summary of expenditures of the Division of
Correction; and
(D) A progress report regarding internal issues, including
without limitation:
(i) Inmate discipline;
(ii) Utilization of programming;
(iii) Facilities and bed space utilization;
(iv) Upkeep issues; and
(v) Construction needs.
(3) The portion of the report regarding the Division of
Community Correction shall include the number of persons sentenced or
transferred to the Division of Community Correction during the prior fiscal
year for each criminal offense classification, including without limitation
statistics on the racial makeup of persons sentenced or transferred to the
Division of Community Correction for each criminal offense classification.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-27-107(d), concerning the duties of the
Director of the Division of Correction, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Subject to the rules, policies, and procedures prescribed by the
Board of Corrections, the director shall:
(1) Administer the Division of Correction and supervise the
administration of all institutions, facilities, and services under the
jurisdiction of the Division of Correction;
(2) Employ such personnel as are required in the administration
of the provisions of this act, provided that the employment of personnel
shall be in accordance with the applicable laws and personnel rules of the
state;
(3) Institute programs for the training and development of
personnel within the Division of Correction and have authority to suspend,
discharge, or otherwise discipline personnel in accordance with policies
prescribed by the Board of Corrections;
(4) Make an annual report to the Board of Corrections, which
will be forwarded to the Governor and the General Assembly, on the work of
the Division of Correction, including statistics and other data, income
derived by the Division of Correction from agriculture, livestock, and other
02/25/2025 2:56:54 PM CEB163

HB1593
farming activities and from prison inmates' activities, a summary of
expenditures of the Division of Correction, and progress reports regarding
internal issues such as inmate discipline, utilization of programming,
facilities and bed space utilization, upkeep issues, and construction needs;
(5) Cooperate with the Division of Community Correction, the
Post-Prison Transfer Board, the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, judicial
districts, counties, and municipalities to provide the guidance and services
required to ensure a full range of correctional options for the state as a
whole; and
(6)(5)(A) Designate those employees of the Division of
Correction who shall have the powers of peace officers in the enforcement of
criminal laws to the extent they apply to employees, inmates, and persons on
Division of Correction property, while participating in the search and
capture of an inmate who has escaped custody, or while assisting law
enforcement officers in the search and capture of any fugitive or escapee
from another jurisdiction.
(B) The employees so designated have the authority to use
blue rotating or flashing emergency lights on Division of Correction vehicles
and exercise other law enforcement powers exercised by police and other law
enforcement personnel.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-27-140 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-140. Division of Community Correction annual report — Quarterly
report of position vacancies.
(a)(1) On July 31 of each year, the Division of Community Correction
shall submit an annual report to the Legislative Council showing the number
of persons sentenced or transferred to the division during the fiscal year
for each criminal offense classification.
(2) Persons sentenced or transferred for multiple offenses shall
be noted in the report.
(b) The report shall include a breakdown by race of all persons
charged in each criminal offense classification.
(c)(a) The division Division of Community Correction shall cooperate
with and upon request make presentations and provide various reports, to the
extent the division's budget will allow, to the Legislative Council
concerning division policy and criteria on discretionary offender programs
02/25/2025 2:56:54 PM CEB163

HB1593
and services.
(d)(b) The division shall report quarterly to the Legislative Council
or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, the:
(1) Number of parole or probation officer positions currently
vacant in the division;
(2) Number of parole or probation assistant area manager
positions currently vacant in the division;
(3) Number of parole or probation area manager positions
currently vacant in the division; and
(4) Average case load being assigned to each parole or probation
officer.

























02/25/2025 2:56:54 PM CEB163